Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3257.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 10.65, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Consultation duties. (a) An agency must recognize the unique legal relationship between the state of Minnesota and the Minnesota Tribal governments, respect the fundamental principles that establish and maintain this relationship, and accord Tribal governments the same respect accorded to other governments. (b) An agency must, in consultation with Minnesota Tribal governments, implement Tribal consultation policies to comply with this section and guide the agency's work with Minnesota Tribal governments, and must submit these policies to the governor and lieutenant governor. Tribal consultation policies should address the communication protocols for each Minnesota Tribal government, which should be developed in coordination with representatives of each Minnesota Tribal government. An agency must update the Tribal consultation policies as often as required in order to facilitate timely and meaningful consultation, but no less than biannually. (c) Consultation under this section is a duty of an agency to consult with the governing body or bodies of each individual Minnesota Tribal government. Coordination with groups or entities that have representation on some or all of the governing bodies of the Minnesota Tribal governments, such as the Minnesota Indian Affairs Council or the Minnesota Chippewa Tribe, is encouraged but does not satisfy an agency's duty to consult with individual Minnesota Tribal governments on matters that have Tribal implications. If a matter has implications for one Minnesota Tribal government, but not others, the agency's duty is to only consult those Minnesota Tribal governments affected. (d) An agency must consult with each Minnesota Tribal government at least annually, and as often as is required to address matters that have Tribal implications. (e) An agency must consult with Minnesota Tribal governments on legislative and fiscal matters that affect one or all Minnesota Tribal governments or their members to identify priority issues in order to allow agencies to proactively engage Minnesota Tribal governments in the agency's development of legislative and fiscal proposals in time for submission into the governor's recommended budget and legislative proposals each year. (f) An agency must develop and maintain ongoing consultation with the Minnesota Tribal governments related to matters that have Tribal implications. Agencies must consider the input gathered from Tribal consultation into their decision-making processes, with the goal of achieving mutually beneficial solutions. (g) An agency and a Minnesota Tribal government may agree that a formal consultation is not necessary for a given year on a given matter that has Tribal implications, and the agency must keep a written record of this decision. (h) The prospective duty to consult does not apply to action on a matter that has Tribal implications if immediate action is required to address a present and immediate threat to the health, safety, or welfare of Minnesota citizens. For these actions, every effort should be made to communicate, and formal consultation should occur as soon as possible. The duty to consult also does not apply to criminal proceedings or other investigations or legal proceedings that prohibit an agency from disclosure. (i) An agency must designate a Tribal liaison to assume responsibility for implementation of the Tribal consultation policy and to serve as the principal point of contact for Minnesota Tribal governments. The Tribal liaison must be able to directly and regularly meet and communicate with the agency's commissioner and deputy and assistant commissioners in order to appropriately conduct government-to-government consultation and cooperation. (j) The state has instituted Tribal-state government relations training, new text begin developed in partnership with the 11 Tribal Nations, the Department of Transportation, and the University of Minnesota Sovereignty Institute, new text end which deleted text begin isdeleted text end new text begin serves asnew text end the foundation and basis of all other Tribal government relations training sources. All agencies must direct certain staff to complete available training to foster a collaborative relationship between the state of Minnesota and Minnesota Tribal governments, and to facilitate timely and meaningful consultation. In addition to all commissioners, deputy commissioners, and assistant commissioners, at a minimum all agency employees whose work is likely to include matters that have Tribal implications must attend Tribal-state relations training. Tribal liaisons must actively support and participate in the Tribal-state relations training. (k) Any agency or board that is not listed in the definition of agency in subdivision 2 is encouraged to and may engage in consultation and communication with the Minnesota Tribal governments for all matters that have Tribal implications.